District of Columbia statutes.
50-708

Vehicle conversions.

(a)

The requirements of this chapter may be met through conversion of existing or new gasoline or diesel-powered vehicles to clean-fuel vehicles which comply with the applicable requirements of this chapter. For purposes of such provisions, the conversion of a vehicle to a clean-fuel vehicle shall be treated as a purchase. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to provide that any covered fleet operator subject to the requirements of this chapter shall be required to convert existing or new gasoline or diesel-powered vehicles to clean-fuel vehicles or to purchase converted vehicles.

(b)

Manufacturers of conversion kits, as well as installers, shall, on request of any fleet operator, the District, or the EPA, demonstrate that vehicles converted to clean-fuel vehicles have a configuration that complies with the emission standards contained in the Clean Air Act, any regulations promulgated by the Environmental Protection Agency, and any regulations promulgated by the Mayor in accordance with this chapter.

Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-243, § 9
as added Mar. 14, 1995, D.C. Law 10-201, § 2(g), 41 DCR 7178
1981 Ed., § 40-2008.